District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.11

Tax implications.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

For purposes of the District of Columbia Office of Tax and Revenue, all loan repayment awards shall not be considered income and are therefore not taxable.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 12, 53 DCR 61
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 532(a), 58 DCR 1008
D.C. Law 18-370 repealed subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) For purposes of the United Stated Internal Revenue Service, all loan repayment awards are considered income and are therefore taxable. It is the responsibility of each participant to report loan repayment awards received through the Program on all relevant tax and financial documents.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 532(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
Short title: Section 531 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle D of title V of the act may be cited as “Health Professional Recruitment Program Amendment Act of 2010”.